Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5429.
people of the state of michigan enact: 1 2 3 part 1 line-item appropriations FOR FISCAL YEAR 2025-2026 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Sec. 101. There is appropriated for the various state departments and agencies, the judicial branch, and the legislative branch described in this part for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2026, from the following funds: APPROPRIATION SUMMARY GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 2,025,000 Interdepartmental grant revenues: Total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers 0 ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 2,025,000 Federal revenues: Total federal revenues 0 Special revenue funds: Total local revenues 0 Total private revenues 0 Total other state restricted revenues 0 State general fund/general purpose $ 2,025,000 Sec. 102. DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES (1) APPROPRIATION SUMMARY GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 2,025,000 Interdepartmental grant revenues: Total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers 0 ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 2,025,000 Federal revenues: Total federal revenues 0 Special revenue funds: 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 Total local revenues 0 Total private revenues 0 Total other state restricted revenues 0 State general fund/general purpose $ 2,025,000 (2) BEHAVIORAL HEALTH PROGRAM ADMINISTRATION AND SPECIAL PROJECTS Behavioral health program administration $ 2,025,000 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 2,025,000 Appropriated from: State general fund/general purpose $ 2,025,000 PART 2 PROVISIONS CONCERNING APPROPRIATIONS FOR FISCAL YEAR 2025-2026 GENERAL SECTIONS Sec. 201. In accordance with section 30 of article IX of the state constitution of 1963, for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2026, total state spending from state sources under part 1 is $2,025,000.00 and total state spending from state sources under part 1 to be paid to local units of government is $0.00. Sec. 202. The appropriations under this part and part 1 are subject to the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1101 to 18.1594. DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES Sec. 301. (1) Funds appropriated in part 1 for behavioral health program administration must be allocated for the autism navigator program. The department of health and human services 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 shall require a contractor receiving funds under this section to comply with performance-related metrics established by the department of health and human services to maintain eligibility for funding. The performance-related metrics must include, but are not limited to, all of the following: (a) Each contractor must have an accreditation that attests to the contractor's competency and effectiveness in providing services. (b) Each contractor must demonstrate cost-effectiveness. (c) Each contractor must ensure the contractor's ability to leverage private dollars to strengthen and maximize service provision. (d) Each contractor must provide quarterly reports to the department of health and human services on the number of clients served by PIHP region, units of service provision by PIHP region, and the contractor's ability to meet stated goals. (2) In addition to the quarterly reports under subsection (1)(d), the department of health and human services shall require a contractor receiving funds under this section to submit a report to the department not later than 60 days after the end of the contract period. The report must include specific information on services and programs provided by the contractor, the client base to which the services and programs were provided by the contractor, and the contractor's expenditures for the services. The department of health and human services shall submit the reports received under this subsection to the senate and house of representatives appropriations subcommittees on health and human services, the senate and house fiscal agencies, the senate and house policy offices, and the state budget office. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 (3) As used in this section: (a) "PIHP" means an entity designated by the department of health and human services as a regional entity or a specialty prepaid inpatient health plan for Medicaid mental health services, services to individuals with developmental disabilities, and substance use disorder services. Regional entities are described in section 204b of the mental health code, 1974 PA 258, MCL 330.1204b. Specialty prepaid inpatient health plans are described in section 232b of the mental health code, 1974 PA 258, MCL 330.1232b. (b) "PIHP region" means a region covered by a PIHP.